New York, session 2025-2026, S7083.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5-106 of the election law is amended by adding two 2 new subdivisions 7 and 8 to read as follows: 3 7. No person who does not have the right to register for or vote at 4 any election under the provisions of this chapter and/or the state 5 constitution shall have the right to register for or vote at any 6 election granted to such person by a county, city, town, or village 7 through any action including, but not limited to, any amendment of a 8 municipal charter or passage of any local law. 9 8. No person shall have their right to register for or vote at any 10 election abridged by a county, city, town, or village through any action 11 including, but not limited to, any amendment of a municipal charter or 12 passage of any local law. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03350-01-5